Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.18.140

Industry skill panels—Standards—Report.

The board shall establish industry skill panel standards that identify the expectations for industry skill panel products and services. The board shall establish the standards in consultation with labor, the state board for community and technical colleges, the employment security department, the institute of workforce development and economic sustainability, and the department of commerce. Continued funding of particular industry skill panels shall be based on meeting the standards established by the board under this section. Beginning December 1, 2008, the board shall report annually to the governor and the economic development and higher education committees of the legislature on the results of the industry skill panels funded under this chapter in meeting the standards.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2011; 2008 c 103 s 4.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Findings—Intent—2008 c 103: See note following RCW 28C.18.010.